Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-6720
Purpose of act; applicability.

(1) The purposes of the Medication Aide Act are to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of the public by providing for the accurate, cost-effective, efficient, and safe utilization of medication aides to assist in the administration of medications by (a) competent individuals, (b) caretakers who are parents, foster parents, family, friends or legal guardians, and (c) licensed health care professionals.

(2) The act applies to all settings in which medications are administered except the home, unless the in-home administration of medication is provided through a licensed home health agency, a licensed or certified home and community-based provider, or a licensed PACE center as defined in section 71-424.01.

(3) The act does not apply to the provision of reminders to persons to self-administer medication or assistance to persons in the delivery of nontherapeutic topical applications by in-home personal services workers. For purposes of this subsection, in-home personal services worker has the definition found in section 71-6501.

Laws 1998, LB 1354, § 10;

Laws 2007, LB236, § 44;

Laws 2020, LB1053, § 20.